Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 6. High Bailiff

§ 331.
Oath; bond.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office, a high bailiff shall be sworn and give a bond such as may be required by the assistant judges.
The cost of such bond shall be paid by the county.

§ 332.
Powers and duties.

A high bailiff may serve writs which the sheriff is incompetent to serve, and his or her fees shall be the same as those of the sheriff.

§ 333.
Confinement of sheriff; vacancy.

A high bailiff by virtue of a writ or other process directed to him or her against the sheriff may commit the sheriff to the Commissioner of Corrections.
While the sheriff remains in confinement, or in case of vacancy in the office, the functions of the sheriff shall be exercised by the high bailiff, who shall have the powers and be subject to the liabilities of a sheriff until the sheriff is released from confinement or one is appointed and sworn into office.

HISTORY:

1971, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. July 1, 1972.